District of Columbia statutes.
8-436

Annual reporting.

[Not funded].

History

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 7, 59 DCR 10166

Editor's Notes

Section 14(b) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 6 and 7 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register, but not before October 1, 2013.